Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Judicial Nominating Commissions

34.010.
Terms — Appointments.

Members of judicial nominating commissions, both statewide and local, shall hold office for a term of four (4) years and until such time as their successors shall be appointed or elected, except as provided in subsection (2).

Of those members appointed by the Governor to the first judicial nominating commissions, the appointments shall be as follows:

One (1) member of the political party having the largest number of registered voters and one (1) member of the political party having the second largest number of registered voters shall be appointed for a term to expire January 1, 1980; and

One (1) member of the political party having the largest number of registered voters and one (1) member of the political party having the second largest number of registered voters shall be appointed for a term to expire January 1, 1978.

Thereafter, as each term expires, the vacancy so created shall be filled by an appointee from the same political party for a term of four (4) years.

Appointments or elections to fill the unexpired term of a member shall be for the remainder of the term.

Members representing the bar shall be elected according to rules promulgated by the Supreme Court with the expenses of the elections being paid from the State Treasury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 51, § 1, effective March 9, 1976.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Kentucky Divorce Statute: A Call for Reform, 66 Ky. L.J. 724 (1977-1978).

34.020.
Compensation of members.

Members of judicial nominating commissions shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be paid their necessary expenses for each day spent in the performance of their duties. All claims for expenses shall be approved by the Chief Justice or his designee and shall be paid out of the State Treasury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 51, § 2, effective March 9, 1976.

34.030.
Administrative services — Records.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide administrative support for, and maintain the records of, judicial nominating commissions. The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall certify the costs for these services to the Chief Justice who, upon verification, shall certify the expenses for payment out of the State Treasury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 51, § 3, effective March 9, 1976.